Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-247
Telephone solicitation message; requirements.

All telephone solicitation messages transmitted by an automatic dialing-announcing device shall:

(1) At the beginning of the message, state clearly the identity of the person making the call; and

(2) During or after the message, state clearly the telephone number, other than that of the device which made the call, or address of such person.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1211;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 109;

Laws 2008, LB720, § 3.